Connecticut, session 2026, SB00440.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section 31-236 of the
2 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
3 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (3) During any week in which the administrator finds that the
5 individual's total or partial unemployment is due to the existence of a
6 labor dispute other than a lockout at the factory, establishment or other
7 premises at which the individual is or has been employed, [provided]
8 except that the provisions of this subsection do not apply if it is shown
9 to the satisfaction of the administrator that: (A) For a labor dispute that
10 begins on or after December 14, 2027, such labor dispute has been
11 continuous for fourteen days since the commencement of such labor
12 dispute; (B) (i) the individual is not participating in or financing or
13 directly interested in the labor dispute that caused the unemployment,
14 and [(B)] (ii) the individual does not belong to a trade, class or
SB440 / File No. 367 1

SB440 File No. 367
15 organization of workers, members of which, immediately before the
16 commencement of the labor dispute, were employed at the premises at
17 which the labor dispute occurred, and are participating in or financing
18 or directly interested in the dispute; or (C) the individual's
19 unemployment is due to the existence of a lockout. A lockout exists
20 whether or not such action is to obtain for the employer more
21 advantageous terms when an employer (i) fails to provide employment
22 to its employees with whom the employer is engaged in a labor dispute,
23 either by physically closing its plant or informing its employees that
24 there will be no work until the labor dispute has terminated, or (ii)
25 makes an announcement that work will be available after the expiration
26 of the existing contract only under terms and conditions that are less
27 favorable to the employees than those current immediately prior to such
28 announcement; provided in either event the recognized or certified
29 bargaining agent shall have advised the employer that the employees
30 with whom the employer is engaged in the labor dispute are ready, able
31 and willing to continue working pending the negotiation of a new
32 contract under the terms and conditions current immediately prior to
33 such announcement;
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 31-236(a)(3)
LAB Joint Favorable
SB440 / File No. 367 2

SB440 File No. 367
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Labor Dept. UITF - Potential See Below See Below
Revenue Gain
Labor Dept. UITF - Potential See Below See Below
Cost
Labor Dept. GF - Cost 205,000 210,000
Note: UITF=Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund; GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which makes striking workers eligible for unemployment
benefits after they have been on strike for 14 consecutive days, results in
a potential cost and potential revenue gain to the Unemployment
Insurance Trust Fund, starting in FY 27. In addition, the bill results in a
one-time cost of $415,000 to the General Fund ($205,000 in FY 27 and
$210,000 in FY 28).
To the extent any striking workers become eligible for
unemployment benefits as a result of the bill, this would result in a cost
to the trust fund. Subsequent increases in experience ratings by
employers would result in increased tax revenue to the trust fund on a
lagged basis. The amounts are dependent on striking workers' benefits
and affected employers' experience ratings.
Additionally, the bill would require the Labor Department to make
technology changes to ReEmployCT, the unemployment insurance
administration system, which results in a cost of $205,000 in FY 27 and
$210,000 in FY 28 ($415,000 in total).
SB440 / File No. 367 3

SB440 File No. 367
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above for the trust
fund would continue into the future subject to the number of workers
and employers affected. There are no fiscal impacts to the General Fund
beyond FY 28.
SB440 / File No. 367 4

SB440 File No. 367
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 440
AN ACT CONCERNING UNEMPLOYMENT FOR STRIKING
WORKERS.